Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2540.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5666HV (2) 91 jda/jh H.F. 2540 Section 1. Section 256.7, subsection 26, paragraph a, 1 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as 2 follows: 3 Adopt a core curriculum and adopt rules that establish high 4 school graduation requirements for all students in school 5 districts and accredited nonpublic schools that include at a 6 minimum satisfactory completion of four years of English and 7 language arts, three years of mathematics, three years of 8 science, and three years of social studies , and, beginning with 9 students in the 2030-2031 school year graduating class, one 10 semester of computer science and artificial intelligence, or 11 the trimester or quarter equivalent, which may include computer 12 science instruction provided in grade eight pursuant to 13 section 256.11, subsection 4 . One semester, or the trimester 14 or quarter equivalent, of computer science and artificial 15 intelligence instruction shall satisfy the graduation 16 requirement associated with both computer science and 17 artificial intelligence instruction and one semester, or the 18 trimester or quarter equivalent, of the graduation requirement 19 associated with either mathematics or science. 20 Sec. 2. Section 256.7, subsection 26, paragraph a, 21 subparagraph (4), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 22 (4) The rules shall provide for the establishment of 23 high-quality standards for computer science and artificial 24 intelligence education taught by elementary, middle, and high 25 schools, in accordance with the goal established under section 26 284.6A, subsection 1 , setting a foundation for personal and 27 professional success in a high-technology, knowledge-based Iowa 28 economy. The high-quality standards for computer science and 29 artificial intelligence education must require that all levels 30 and grades of computer science and artificial intelligence 31 instruction include instruction related to the fundamental 32 concepts of evolving computer science technologies and 33 artificial intelligence, including instruction that explains 34 what artificial intelligence is, how artificial intelligence 35 -1- LSB 5666HV (2) 91 jda/jh 1/ 15 H.F. 2540 works, and the societal and ethical impacts of artificial 1 intelligence. 2 Sec. 3. Section 256.9, subsection 61, Code 2026, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 61. Develop and implement a statewide kindergarten through 5 grade twelve computer science and artificial intelligence 6 instruction plan by July 1, 2022 . 7 Sec. 4. Section 256.9, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 8 following new subsections: 9 NEW SUBSECTION . 80. On or before June 30, 2027, publish 10 on the departmentâs internet site a list of computer science 11 and artificial intelligence courses that satisfy the rules 12 adopted by the state board pursuant to section 256.7, 13 subsection 32, paragraph âcâ , and that a school district 14 or accredited nonpublic school may use to implement the 15 graduation requirement described in section 256.11, subsection 16 5, paragraph âlâ , subparagraph (2). The list must include 17 the names of the computer science and artificial intelligence 18 courses and the course codes associated with each computer 19 science and artificial intelligence course. 20 NEW SUBSECTION . 81. Publish on the departmentâs internet 21 site all of the information submitted to the department by 22 school districts pursuant to section 256.11, subsection 5, 23 paragraph âlâ , subparagraph (3). 24 NEW SUBSECTION . 82. On or before June 30, 2027, create 25 and publish on the departmentâs internet site a plan to 26 expand statewide computer science and artificial intelligence 27 teacher capacity to support implementation of the graduation 28 requirement described in section 256.11, subsection 5, 29 paragraph âlâ , subparagraph (2). The plan must specifically 30 address targeted support for schools with a total enrollment of 31 less than five hundred students in grades nine through twelve. 32 When creating the plan, the department shall invite input from 33 representatives of kindergarten through grade twelve schools, 34 including students, computer science teacher professional 35 -2- LSB 5666HV (2) 91 jda/jh 2/ 15 H.F. 2540 development providers, industries that employ technology 1 workers, and higher education institutions that offer computer 2 science teacher preparation pathways. 3 Sec. 5. Section 256.11, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 4 2026, is amended to read as follows: 5 b. Computer science and artificial intelligence instruction 6 incorporating the standards established under section 256.7, 7 subsection 26 , paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (4), shall be 8 offered in at least one grade level commencing with the school 9 year beginning July 1, 2023 . 10 Sec. 6. Section 256.11, subsection 4, paragraph b, Code 11 2026, is amended to read as follows: 12 b. Computer science and artificial intelligence instruction 13 incorporating the standards established under section 256.7, 14 subsection 26 , paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (4), shall be 15 offered in at least one grade level commencing with the 16 school year beginning July 1, 2023 . Career exploration 17 and development shall be designed so that students are 18 appropriately prepared to create an individual career 19 and academic plan pursuant to section 279.61 , incorporate 20 foundational career and technical education concepts aligned 21 with the six career and technical education service areas as 22 defined in subsection 5 , paragraph âhâ , incorporate relevant 23 twenty-first century skills to facilitate career readiness, and 24 introduce students to career opportunities within the local 25 community and across this state. 26 Sec. 7. Section 256.11, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended 27 by adding the following new paragraph: 28 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0c. Career exploration and development 29 shall be designed so that students are appropriately prepared 30 to create an individual career and academic plan pursuant to 31 section 279.61, incorporate foundational career and technical 32 education concepts aligned with the six career and technical 33 education service areas as defined in subsection 5, paragraph 34 âhâ , incorporate relevant twenty-first century skills to 35 -3- LSB 5666HV (2) 91 jda/jh 3/ 15 H.F. 2540 facilitate career readiness, and introduce students to career 1 opportunities within the local community and across this state. 2 Sec. 8. Section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph a, Code 3 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 4 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (3) The five units of science may include 5 not more than one unit of instruction related to computer 6 science and artificial intelligence. 7 Sec. 9. Section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraphs e and l, 8 Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 9 e. Two additional units of mathematics. 10 (1) The two additional units of mathematics may include 11 instruction related to applied sciences, technology, 12 engineering, or manufacturing, including transportation, 13 distribution, logistics, architecture, and construction, which 14 may be offered and taught through dedicated units of coursework 15 or through units of coursework that also meet the requirements 16 of the coursework required under paragraph âhâ , subparagraph 17 (1), subparagraph division (c). The state board shall adopt 18 rules pursuant to chapter 17A to implement this paragraph. 19 (2) The two additional units of mathematics may include not 20 more than one unit of instruction related to computer science 21 and artificial intelligence. 22 (3) The state board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 23 17A to implement this paragraph. 24 l. (1) One-half unit of computer science commencing 25 with the school year beginning July 1, 2022 and artificial 26 intelligence . The one-half unit of computer science and 27 artificial intelligence shall incorporate the standards 28 established pursuant to section 256.7, subsection 26 , paragraph 29 âaâ , subparagraph (4) , and may be offered online in accordance 30 with rules adopted pursuant to section 256.7, subsection 32 , 31 paragraph âaâ . The one-half unit of computer science and 32 artificial intelligence shall satisfy all of the following 33 requirements: 34 (a) Be of high quality. 35 -4- LSB 5666HV (2) 91 jda/jh 4/ 15 H.F. 2540 (b) Meet or exceed the curriculum standards and 1 requirements established by the state board. 2 (c) Be offered and taught in a traditional classroom 3 setting; provided, however, that if a traditional classroom 4 setting is not feasible, the one-half unit of computer science 5 and artificial intelligence may be offered and taught in any 6 of the following ways: 7 (i) Through a combination of instruction that is delivered 8 in a traditional classroom setting and instruction that is 9 delivered primarily over the internet. 10 (ii) Through instruction that is delivered primarily over 11 the internet in accordance with rules adopted by the state 12 board pursuant to section 256.7, subsection 32, paragraph 13 âaâ , and is tailored to meet the needs of each participating 14 student. 15 (2) (a) All students, beginning with students in the 16 2030-2031 school year graduating class, shall complete one-half 17 unit of computer science and artificial intelligence as a 18 condition of graduation, which shall incorporate the standards 19 established pursuant to section 256.7, subsection 26, paragraph 20 âaâ , subparagraph (4), and which may include computer science 21 instruction provided in grade eight pursuant to section 22 256.11, subsection 4. The condition of graduation shall not 23 apply to a student who enrolls in a school district or an 24 accredited nonpublic school in grade twelve immediately after 25 being enrolled in a school located outside of this state that 26 does not impose a comparable computer science and artificial 27 intelligence instruction requirement. 28 (b) (i) On or before July 1, 2030, a school district or 29 accredited nonpublic school may apply to the department of 30 education for a one-time waiver of the implementation of the 31 condition of graduation described in this subparagraph. The 32 waiver shall be for a period not longer than one school year. 33 (ii) The state board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 34 17A establishing standards for the submission of applications 35 -5- LSB 5666HV (2) 91 jda/jh 5/ 15 H.F. 2540 for waivers of the implementation of the condition of 1 graduation described in this subparagraph and the departmentâs 2 consideration and approval of waivers. The rules must 3 require that the department of education may only approve an 4 application for a waiver submitted pursuant to subparagraph 5 subdivision (i) if the school district or accredited nonpublic 6 school applying for the waiver demonstrates to the department 7 that the school district or accredited nonpublic school made 8 a reasonable attempt to implement the condition of graduation 9 described in this subparagraph. 10 (iii) This subparagraph division is repealed July 1, 2031. 11 (3) Each school district shall report annually to the 12 department all of the following: 13 (a) The course names and course codes associated with all 14 computer science and artificial intelligence courses offered 15 and taught in the school district pursuant to this paragraph 16 and, to the extent such information is available, a description 17 of the format in which each course is offered and taught. 18 (b) The number of teachers employed by the school district 19 who teach computer science and artificial intelligence 20 instruction, sortable by the endorsements and authorizations 21 held by each teacher and the highest academic degree attained 22 by each teacher. The report shall not include any personally 23 identifiable information related to the teachers employed by 24 the school district who teach computer science and artificial 25 intelligence instruction. 26 (c) The number of students enrolled in a computer science 27 and artificial intelligence course offered and taught by the 28 school district pursuant to this paragraph, sortable by the 29 grade level of each student. The report shall not include any 30 personally identifiable information related to the students 31 enrolled in a computer science and artificial intelligence 32 course offered and taught by the school district. 33 Sec. 10. Section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph h, Code 34 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 35 -6- LSB 5666HV (2) 91 jda/jh 6/ 15 H.F. 2540 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (04) Units of instruction provided 1 under subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (b) or (c), may 2 include up to one unit of instruction related to computer 3 science and artificial intelligence, if the teacher providing 4 such instruction has either an initial career and technical 5 education authorization issued by the board of educational 6 examiners or a career and technical education authorization 7 issued by the board of educational examiners. 8 Sec. 11. Section 256.11, subsection 17, paragraph a, 9 subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 10 (2) If a school district or accredited nonpublic school 11 meets the requirements of subparagraph (1), subparagraph 12 division (a) or (b), the school district or accredited 13 nonpublic school may exceed the two-subject limitation 14 specified in subparagraph (1), unnumbered paragraph 1, for the 15 purpose of providing world language, personal finance literacy, 16 and computer science and artificial intelligence coursework 17 online in accordance with paragraph âcâ . 18 Sec. 12. Section 256.13, Code 2026, is amended to read as 19 follows: 20 256.13 Nonresident pupils. 21 The boards of directors of two or more school districts may 22 by agreement provide for attendance of pupils residing in one 23 district in the schools of another district for the purpose of 24 taking courses not offered in the district of their residence , 25 including computer science and artificial intelligence courses 26 described in section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph âlâ . The 27 boards may also provide by agreement that the districts will 28 combine their enrollments for one or more grades. Courses 29 and grades made available to students in this manner shall be 30 considered as complying with any standards or laws requiring 31 the offering of such courses and grades. The boards of 32 directors of districts entering into such agreements may 33 provide for sharing the costs and expenses of the courses. If 34 the agreement provides for whole grade sharing, the costs and 35 -7- LSB 5666HV (2) 91 jda/jh 7/ 15 H.F. 2540 expenses shall be paid as provided in sections 282.10 through 1 282.12 . 2 Sec. 13. Section 256.16, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 3 by adding the following new paragraph: 4 NEW PARAGRAPH . p. Include preparation in computer science, 5 artificial intelligence, and computational thinking that is 6 appropriate to the grade level and subject area in which 7 the student who is enrolled in the practitioner preparation 8 program will teach. A higher education institution providing 9 practitioner preparation may satisfy this requirement by 10 requiring a student who is enrolled in the practitioner 11 preparation program to complete a dedicated course or 12 module, or by integrating such preparation into the existing 13 practitioner preparation program. 14 Sec. 14. Section 256.146, subsection 19, Code 2026, is 15 amended to read as follows: 16 19. Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A establishing 17 endorsements and authorizations for computer science and 18 artificial intelligence instruction , including . The rules 19 shall include traditional and nontraditional pathways for 20 obtaining such endorsements or authorizations , including 21 through instruction that is delivered primarily over the 22 internet that may be used to demonstrate competence in computer 23 science and artificial intelligence instruction for teachers 24 under an initial or conditional license . 25 Sec. 15. Section 262.9, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 26 following new subsection: 27 NEW SUBSECTION . 43. Develop, in consultation with the 28 institutions of higher education governed by the board, 29 guidance related to how a higher education institution 30 providing practitioner preparation can best incorporate 31 preparation related to computer science, artificial 32 intelligence, and computational thinking into the approved 33 practitioner preparation program, as required under section 34 256.16, subsection 1, paragraph âpâ , and distribute such 35 -8- LSB 5666HV (2) 91 jda/jh 8/ 15 H.F. 2540 guidance to each higher education institution providing 1 practitioner preparation. 2 Sec. 16. Section 280.3, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 3. The board of directors of each public school district 5 and the authorities in charge of each nonpublic school shall 6 develop and implement a kindergarten through grade twelve 7 computer science and artificial intelligence plan by July 1, 8 2022, which that incorporates the standards established under 9 section 256.7, subsection 26 , paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (4), 10 and the minimum educational standards relating to computer 11 science and artificial intelligence contained in section 12 256.11 . 13 Sec. 17. Section 284.6A, subsection 1, paragraphs a and b, 14 Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 15 a. That instruction in high-quality computer science and 16 artificial intelligence for elementary, middle school, and 17 high school students establishes a foundation for personal and 18 professional success in a high-technology, knowledge-based Iowa 19 economy. 20 b. It is the goal of the general assembly that by July 21 1, 2019, each accredited high school offer at least one 22 high-quality computer science and artificial intelligence 23 course, each accredited middle school offer instruction in 24 exploratory computer science and artificial intelligence , and 25 each accredited elementary school offer instruction in the 26 basics of computer science and artificial intelligence . 27 Sec. 18. Section 284.6A, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 28 by adding the following new paragraph: 29 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0c. In order to provide students with the 30 competencies to compete in a twenty-first century workforce, 31 develop skills that translate into high-wage jobs, develop 32 problem solving and critical thinking skills, and encourage 33 the creation and retention of new, high-wage jobs in this 34 state, all high school students enrolled in school districts 35 -9- LSB 5666HV (2) 91 jda/jh 9/ 15 H.F. 2540 or accredited nonpublic schools, beginning with the 2030-2031 1 school year graduating class, students should complete one 2 semester of computer science and artificial intelligence 3 as a condition of graduation as required by section 256.7, 4 subsection 26, paragraph âaâ . 5 Sec. 19. Section 284.6A, subsection 2, paragraphs a and b, 6 Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 7 a. A school district or accredited nonpublic school, or 8 a collaborative of one or more school districts, accredited 9 nonpublic schools, and area education agencies, may apply to 10 the department, in the manner prescribed by the department, to 11 receive moneys from the fund to provide proven professional 12 development activities for Iowa teachers in the area of 13 computer science and artificial intelligence education. 14 b. A school district or accredited nonpublic school may 15 apply to the department, in the manner prescribed by the 16 department, to receive moneys from the fund to provide tuition 17 reimbursement for Iowa teachers , including Iowa teachers under 18 an initial or conditional license, seeking endorsements or 19 authorizations for computer science and artificial intelligence 20 under section 256.146, subsection 19 . 21 Sec. 20. STATE MANDATE FUNDING SPECIFIED. In accordance 22 with section 25B.2, subsection 3, the state cost of requiring 23 compliance with any state mandate included in this Act shall 24 be paid by a school district from state school foundation aid 25 received by the school district under section 257.16, and from 26 any grants received under the computer science professional 27 development fund established pursuant to section 284.6A. This 28 specification of the payment of the state cost shall be deemed 29 to meet all of the state funding-related requirements of 30 section 25B.2, subsection 3, and no additional state funding 31 shall be necessary for the full implementation of this Act 32 by and enforcement of this Act against all affected school 33 districts. 34 Sec. 21. APPLICABILITY. The following applies to students 35 -10- LSB 5666HV (2) 91 jda/jh 10/ 15 H.F. 2540 admitted to an approved practitioner preparation program on or 1 after July 1, 2028: 2 The section of this Act amending section 256.16. 3